North Carolina, session 2025, HB311.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred thirty-one thousand dollars ($231,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of
Gibson to be used as follows:
(1) Fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) for a generator at main lift station.
(2) Eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000) for a portable generator.
(3) Thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for lift station rehabilitation.
(4) Eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000) for new water meters.
(5) Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) for ditch work.
(6) Sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) for Town vehicles.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H311-v-1*